District of Columbia statutes.
34-402

Commission to inquire into violations by utilities; enforcement of laws affecting utilities.

The Commission shall inquire into any neglect or violation of the laws or regulations in force in the District of Columbia by any public utility doing business therein, or by the officers, agents, or employees thereof, or by any person operating the plant of any public utility, and shall have the power, and it shall be its duty, to enforce the provisions of this subtitle as well as all other laws relating to public utilities.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 993, ch. 150, § 8, par. 90
Penal provisions, see §§ 34-701 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 43-102.
1973 Ed., § 43-1002.